Tennessee statutes. Title 37 Juveniles
Part 1 General Provisions
37-1-114. Detention or shelter care of child prior to hearing on petition.

A child taken into custody shall not be detained or placed in shelter care prior to the hearing on the petition unless there is probable cause to believe that the child:

Has committed the delinquent or unruly act with which the child is charged; or

Is a neglected, dependent or abused child, and in either case the child's detention or shelter care is required because the child is subject to an immediate threat to the child's health or safety to the extent that delay for a hearing would be likely to result in severe or irreparable harm, or the child may abscond or be removed from the jurisdiction of the court, and in either case, there is no less drastic alternative to removal of the child from the custody of the child's parent, guardian, legal custodian or the person who physically possesses or controls the child available that would reasonably and adequately protect the child's health or safety or prevent the child's removal from the jurisdiction of the court pending a hearing.

Children alleged to be unruly shall not be detained for more than twenty-four (24) hours, excluding nonjudicial days unless there has been a detention hearing and a judicial determination that there is probable cause to believe the child has violated a valid court order, and in no event shall such a child be detained for more than seventy-two (72) hours exclusive of nonjudicial days prior to an adjudicatory hearing. Nothing herein prohibits the court from ordering the placement of children in shelter care where appropriate, and such placement shall not be considered detention within the meaning of this section.

A child shall not be detained in any secure facility or secure portion of any facility unless:

There is probable cause to believe the child has committed a delinquent offense constituting:

A crime against a person resulting in the serious injury or death of the victim or involving the likelihood of serious injury or death to such victim; or

The unlawful possession of a handgun or carrying of a weapon, as prohibited by title 39, chapter 17, part 13;

There is probable cause to believe the child has committed any other delinquent offense involving the likelihood of serious physical injury or death, or an offense constituting a felony, violation of probation or violation of aftercare, and the child:

Is currently on probation;

Is currently awaiting court action on a previous alleged delinquent offense;

Is alleged to be an escapee or absconder from a juvenile facility, institution or other court-ordered placement; or

Has, within the previous twelve (12) months, willfully failed to appear at any juvenile court hearing, engaged in violent conduct resulting in serious injury to another person or involving the likelihood of serious injury or death, or been adjudicated delinquent by virtue of an offense constituting a felony if committed by an adult;

There is probable cause to believe the child has committed a delinquent offense, and special circumstances in accordance with the provisions of subsection (a) indicate the child should be detained; however, in any such case, the judge shall, within twenty-four (24) hours of the actual detention, excluding nonjudicial days, issue a written order on a form prescribed by the Tennessee council of juvenile and family court judges setting forth the specific reasons necessitating such detention. Nothing in this subdivision (c)(3) shall be construed as requiring a hearing or formal finding of fact, except as otherwise required by § 37-1-117;

The child is alleged to be an escapee from a secure juvenile facility or institution;

The child is wanted in another jurisdiction for an offense that, if committed by an adult, would be a felony in that jurisdiction;

There is probable cause to believe the child is an unruly child who has violated a valid court order or who is a runaway from another jurisdiction. Any detention of such a child shall be in compliance with subsection (b);

In addition to any of the conditions listed in subdivisions (c)(1)-(6), there is no less restrictive alternative that will reduce the risk of flight or of serious physical harm to the child or to others, including placement of the child with a parent, guardian, legal custodian or relative; use of any of the alternatives listed in § 37-1-116(g); or the setting of bail; and

For the purposes of this subsection (c), “serious physical injury” includes conduct that would constitute the offenses of aggravated rape, rape and aggravated sexual battery.

Acts 1970, ch. 600, § 14; 1979, ch. 289, § 3; 1980, ch. 595, § 1; 1981, ch. 247, § 3; 1982, ch. 882, § 1; 1983, ch. 137, § 1; 1983, ch. 408, § 3; T.C.A., § 37-214; Acts 1994, ch. 998, § 2; 1995, ch. 85, § 1; 1999, ch. 524, § 1; 2013, ch. 255, § 1.

Cross-References. Protective custody of child by hospital or physician, §37-1-404.

Protective custody of sexually abused children, §37-1-608.

Sexual offenses, title 39, ch. 13, part 5.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in the text of Rules 5, 15 and 16 and in the Advisory Commission Comments of Rules 5 and 6 of the Tennessee Rules of Juvenile Procedure.

Law Reviews.

Guidelines for Juvenile Court Practice (Andrew J. Shookhoff), 19 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 5 (1983).

The DOJ Comes to Town: An Argument for Legislative Reform When the Juvenile Court Fails to Protect Due Process Rights, 44 U. Mem. L. Rev. 921 (2014).

Attorney General Opinions. Detainment of juvenile under subdivision (c)(2) of this section, OAG 99-042 (2/25/99).

“Property offense” defined, OAG 99-042 (2/25/99).

A juvenile court may not order the department of children's services to detain or otherwise hold securely a child who has pending delinquency charges and who is currently in the department's custody as a dependent and neglected child without first complying with the statutory requirements to determine whether there is probable cause to believe that the child has committed the delinquent act with which the child is charged, OAG 01-130 (8/20/01).

Collateral References.

Right in child custody proceedings to cross-examine investigating officer whose report is used by court in its decision. 59 A.L.R.3d 1337.

37-1-115. Custody — Release to proper party — Warrant for custody.

A person taking a child into custody shall within a reasonable time:

Release the child to such child's parents, guardian or other custodian upon a promise by such person or persons to bring the child before the court when requested by the court unless such child's detention or shelter care is warranted or required under § 37-1-114; or

Bring the child before the court or deliver such child to a detention or shelter care facility designated by the court or to a medical facility if the child is believed to suffer from a serious physical condition or illness that requires prompt treatment. A person taking a child into custody shall give notice thereof, together with a reason for taking the child into custody, to a parent, guardian or other custodian and to the court. If the child is taken into custody pursuant to the provisions of § 37-1-113(a)(3) prior to the filing of a petition, a petition under § 37-1-120 shall be filed as soon as possible but in no event later than two (2) days after the child is taken into custody excluding Saturdays, Sundays and legal holidays.

If a parent, guardian or other custodian, when requested, fails to bring the child before the court as provided in subsection (a), the court may issue its warrant directing that the child be taken into custody and brought before the court.

A law enforcement officer who has taken a child into custody for the commission of an offense that would be considered a misdemeanor if committed by an adult may, in that officer's professional discretion, issue a citation in lieu of continued custody of the child. In issuing a citation pursuant to this subsection (c), the officer shall:

Prepare a written citation, which shall include the name and address of the cited child, the offense charged, and the time and place of appearance;

Have the child sign the original and duplicate copy of the citation. The officer shall deliver one (1) copy to the child and retain the other; and

Release the cited child from custody.

If the law enforcement officer determines that issuing a citation is appropriate but that circumstances surrounding the issuance of a citation indicate an immediate risk to the safety of the child, the officer shall make efforts to contact a parent, guardian, or legal custodian of the child to retrieve the child in lieu of or prior to taking the child into custody.

Subject to the approval of the juvenile court, each municipal or metropolitan police department or sheriff's department is authorized to create and administer its own juvenile diversion program to address citable juvenile offenses without court involvement. Each program shall be developed in consultation with the juvenile court, local school districts, and other community stakeholders, and shall be subject to the same conditions and limitations as informal adjustment pursuant to § 37-1-110.

Acts 1970, ch. 600, § 15; 1976, ch. 745, § 1; 1981, ch. 247, § 4; T.C.A., § 37-215; Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Juvenile Justice Reform Act of 2018.”

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 55 provided that it is the intent of the general assembly that improvements to the juvenile justice system and expansion of community-based resources for justice-involved children be prioritized, including, but not limited to, evidence-based programs, informal adjustment, diversion, home placement supervision, statewide data collection, early intervention programs and services for children and families, and mental health services, especially in any county underserved with such programs and services.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added (c) and (d).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 58. July 1, 2018; provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act took effect on May 21, 2018.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), §§ 8.3, 8.12, 19.63.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Minors, § 11; 21 Tenn. Juris., Rape, § 11.

Law Reviews.

Rules of Procedure for Courts with Juvenile Jurisdiction in Tennessee (R.B.J. Campbelle, Jr.), 18 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 20 (1982).

37-1-116. Place of detention — Escape or attempted escape — Shelter care.

A child alleged to be delinquent or unruly may be detained only in:

A licensed foster home or a home approved by the court;

A facility operated by a licensed child care agency;

A detention home or center for delinquent children that is under the direction or supervision of the court or other public authority or of a private agency approved by the court; or

Subject to subsection (e), any other suitable place or facility designated or operated by the court. The child may be detained in a jail or other facility for the detention of adults only if:

Other facilities in subdivision (a)(3) are not available;

The detention is in a room separate and removed from those for adults; and

It appears to the satisfaction of the court that public safety and protection reasonably require detention, and it so orders.

The official in charge of a jail or other facility for the detention of adult offenders or persons charged with crime shall inform the court immediately if a person who is or appears to be under eighteen (18) years of age is received at the facility, and shall bring such person before the court upon request or deliver such person to a detention or shelter care facility designated by the court.

If a case is transferred to another court for criminal prosecution, the child may be transferred to the appropriate officer or detention facility in accordance with the law governing the detention of persons charged with crime.

A child alleged to be dependent or neglected may be detained or placed in shelter care only in the facilities stated in subdivisions (a)(1), (2) and (4), and shall not be detained in a jail or other facility intended or used for the detention of adults charged with criminal offenses or of children alleged to be delinquent.

No child may be detained or otherwise placed in any jail or other facility for the detention of adults, except as provided in subsections (c) and (h).

A county may contract with juvenile courts in other counties, other public authorities, or private agencies to place children in any of the facilities listed in subdivisions (a)(1)-(3) and in the first sentence of subdivision (a)(4). The payment for such placements shall be according to per diem allowances established jointly by the department of children's services and the comptroller of the treasury, or as agreed upon between the county and the juvenile court or other authority or agency operating the facility. The cost allowances established jointly by the department and the comptroller of the treasury shall take into account the actual operating costs of the facility, the costs of any special programs offered by the facility, and the cost of any transportation provided by the facility. Any and all such costs of placement and transportation may be assessed against the parents or other persons legally obligated to care for and support the child as provided in § 37-1-150(d).

To the extent necessary to comply with subsection (e), counties may expend funds received from the state for the purpose of improving juvenile court services or providing community alternatives to detention to pay for the alternative placement and transportation services described in subsection (f), and to develop other alternatives to jail for children, including emergency foster homes, runaway/emergency shelters, juvenile summons, crisis intervention, home detention, attendant care and other programs.

A juvenile may be temporarily detained for as short a time as feasible, not to exceed forty-eight (48) hours, in an adult jail or lockup, if:

The juvenile is accused of a serious crime against persons, including criminal homicide, forcible rape, mayhem, kidnapping, aggravated assault, robbery and extortion accompanied by threats of violence;

The county has a low population density not to exceed thirty-five (35) persons per square mile;

The facility and program have received prior certification by the Tennessee corrections institute as providing detention and treatment with total sight and sound separation from adult detainees and prisoners, including no access by trustees;

There is no juvenile court or other public authority, or private agency as provided in subsection (f), able and willing to contract for the placement of the juvenile; and

A determination is made that there is no existing acceptable alternative placement available for the juvenile.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section to the contrary, in any facility that meets the following requisites of separateness, juveniles who meet the detention criteria of § 37-1-114(c) may be held in a juvenile detention facility that is in the same building or on the same grounds as an adult jail or lockup; provided, that no juvenile facility constructed or developed after January 1, 1995, may be located in the same building or directly connected to any adult jail or lockup facility complex:

Total separation between juvenile and adult facility spatial areas such that there could be no haphazard or accidental contact between juvenile and adult residents in the respective facilities;

Total separation in all juvenile and adult program activities within the facilities, including recreation, education, counseling, health care, dining, sleeping and general living activities;

Separate juvenile and adult staff, including management, security staff and direct care staff, such as recreational, educational and counseling. Specialized services staff, such as cooks, bookkeepers and medical professionals who are not normally in contact with detainees or whose infrequent contacts occur under conditions of separation of juveniles and adults, can serve both; and

In the event that state standards or licensing requirements for secure juvenile detention facilities are established, the juvenile facility must meet the standards and be licensed or approved as appropriate.

In determining whether the criteria set out in this subsection (i) are met, the following factors will serve to enhance the separateness of juvenile and adult facilities:

Juvenile staff are employees of or volunteers for a juvenile service agency or the juvenile court with responsibility only for the conduct of the youth serving operations. Juvenile staff are specially trained in the handling of juveniles and the special problems associated with this group;

A separate juvenile operations manual, with written procedures for staff and agency reference, specifies the function and operation of the juvenile program;

There is minimal sharing between the facilities of public lobbies or office/support space for staff;

Juveniles do not share direct service or access space with adult offenders within the facilities, including entrance to and exits from the facilities. All juvenile facility intake, booking and admission processes take place in a separate area and are under the direction of juvenile facility staff. Secure juvenile entrances (sally ports, waiting areas) are independently controlled by juvenile staff and separated from adult entrances. Public entrances, lobbies and waiting areas for the juvenile detention program are also controlled by juvenile staff and separated from similar adult areas. Adult and juvenile residents do not make use of common passageways between intake areas, residential spaces and program/service spaces;

The space available for juvenile living, sleeping and the conduct of juvenile programs conforms to the requirements for secure juvenile detention specified by prevailing case law, prevailing professional standards of care, and by state code; and

The facility is formally recognized as a juvenile detention center by the state agency responsible for monitoring, review or certification of juvenile detention facilities.

Any juvenile who:

Is alleged or adjudicated to be delinquent;

Is confined to a secure detention or correctional facility designated, operated or approved by the court; and

Absconds or attempts to abscond from such facility;

may be charged with the offense of escape or attempted escape and a petition alleging such offense may be filed with the juvenile court of the county in which the alleged offense occurred. If the allegations of the petition are sustained, then the court may make any order of disposition authorized by §37-1-131.

Any juvenile who:

Is alleged or adjudicated to be delinquent;

Has been placed by the court in a secure detention or correctional facility designated, operated or approved by the court;

Is being transported to or from such facility; and

Absconds or attempts to abscond from the custody of the person responsible for such transportation;

may be charged with the offense of escape or attempted escape and a petition alleging such offense may be filed with the juvenile court of the county in which the alleged offense occurred. If the allegations of the petition are sustained, then the court may make any order of disposition authorized by §37-1-131.

Any juvenile may be charged with the offense of escape or attempted escape and a petition alleging the offense may be filed with the juvenile court of the county in which the alleged offense occurred who:

Is adjudicated to be delinquent;

Is placed in a place of detention other than a secure detention facility, as specified in subsection (a); and

Absconds or attempts to abscond from such facility.

Escape or attempted escape from a facility listed in subdivisions (a)(1)-(3) constitutes an offense that, if committed by an adult, would be a misdemeanor. If the allegations of the petition are sustained, then the court may make any order of disposition authorized by § 37-1-131.

Upon an escape by a juvenile who is alleged or adjudicated to be delinquent by virtue of an act which would be a felony if committed by an adult and who is confined to a secure detention or correctional facility designated, operated or approved by the court, the appropriate facility or departmental official shall immediately report the escape to the chief law enforcement officer of the county in which the facility is located. The report shall include the facts of the escape, the time when it occurred and the circumstances under which it occurred, together with the particular description of the escapee, the escapee's age, size, complexion, race, color of hair and eyes, and from what county committed, for what offense, and when.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, no child alleged to be delinquent and meeting any of the criteria under this subsection (k) nor any child committed to the department of children's services as a delinquent child and meeting any of the criteria under this subsection (k) shall be held in shelter care authorized by this section with a child alleged to be dependent or neglected unless the following are satisfied:

There is total separation between facility spatial areas such that there could be no haphazard or accidental contact between a child alleged to be delinquent, or committed as delinquent, who meets the criteria of this subsection (k) and a child alleged to be dependent or neglected; and

There is total separation in all program activities between children alleged to be delinquent, or committed as delinquent, who meet the criteria of this subsection (k) and children alleged to be dependent or neglected, including all program activities listed in subdivision (i)(1)(B) and total separation of any staff for such children as listed in subdivision (i)(1)(C).

The criteria to be used under this subsection (k), together with an allegation of delinquency or commitment to the department as delinquent, are:

The child has been found to be delinquent or is alleged to be delinquent based upon a felony offense constituting a crime against a person or persons;

The child has prior commitments to the department as a result of having committed a felony offense or offenses that constitute a crime against a person or persons;

The child has been found to be delinquent or is alleged to be delinquent based upon a felony drug offense;

The child has prior commitments to the department as a result of having committed a felony drug offense; or

The child has a history of prior convictions for felony offenses that constitute crimes against persons or felony drug offenses, even though the child has never been committed to the department.

The use of seclusion for punitive purposes pre-adjudication or post-adjudication for any child detained in any facility pursuant to § 37-1-114 is prohibited.

Acts 1970, ch. 600, § 16; 1983, ch. 408, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., § 37-216; Acts 1984, ch. 995, § 1; 1989, ch. 278, § 38; 1989, ch. 329, § 1; 1994, ch. 817, § 1; 1996, ch. 1079, § 73; 1999, ch. 508, § 6; 2000, ch. 981, § 51; 2008, ch. 1083, § 1; 2010, ch. 803, § 1; 2018, ch. 1052, § 13.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U. S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Juvenile Justice Reform Act of 2018.”

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 55 provided that it is the intent of the general assembly that improvements to the juvenile justice system and expansion of community-based resources for justice-involved children be prioritized, including, but not limited to, evidence-based programs, informal adjustment, diversion, home placement supervision, statewide data collection, early intervention programs and services for children and families, and mental health services, especially in any county underserved with such programs and services.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added (l ).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 58. July 1, 2018; provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act took effect on May 21, 2018.

Cross-References. Crimes against persons, title 39, ch. 13.

Drug offenses, title 39, ch. 17, part 4.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in the text of Rules 5 and 16 and in the Advisory Commission Comments of Rule 5 of the Tennessee Rules of Juvenile Procedure.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Minors, § 11.

Law Reviews.

Guidelines for Juvenile Court Practice (Andrew J. Shookhoff), 19 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 5 (1983).

Attorney General Opinions. A juvenile offender who has attained the age of majority before being convicted of an offense by a juvenile court may not be held in an adult facility, such as the local jail; such a defendant may only be held in a juvenile detention facility and may not be held beyond the defendant's nineteenth birthday, regardless of whether the offense is a misdemeanor or a felony, OAG 04-038 (3/12/04).

If a juvenile who is adjudicated delinquent absconds from a group home or other non-institutional placement, a petition with a summons should issue; in the event a summons is not effective, the court may issue an order of attachment, OAG 05-008 (1/20/05).

If a person absconds after turning 18, but while serving a commitment for a juvenile offense, the individual is no longer a child and any offense would be handled as an adult offense, OAG 05-008 (1/20/05).

Cited: State v. Carroll, 36 S.W.3d 854, 1999 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 1346 (Tenn. Crim. App. 1999).

37-1-117. Investigation and release or detention — Petition — Hearings.

If a child alleged to have committed a delinquent or unruly act is brought before the court or delivered to a detention facility designated by the court, the intake or other authorized officer of the court shall immediately make an investigation and release the child unless it appears that such child's detention is warranted or required under § 37-1-114.

If such child is not so released, the court shall issue an order authorizing the detention of the child and a petition under § 37-1-120 shall be promptly filed with the court. The filing of a petition shall not preclude participation in informal adjustment pursuant to § 37-1-110. In the case of a child alleged to be delinquent, a detention hearing shall be held no later than seventy-two (72) hours after the child is placed in detention to determine whether such child's detention is required under § 37-1-114. In computing the time limitation for purposes of such detention hearing, nonjudicial days are excluded, but in no event shall the hearing be held later than eighty-four (84) hours after the child is placed in detention. The court, in its discretion, may release the child on an appearance bond or on the child's own recognizance subject to a written agreement to appear in court.

When the court finds, based upon a sworn petition or sworn testimony containing specific factual allegations, that there is probable cause to believe that the conditions specified in § 37-1-114(a)(2) exist and a child is in need of the immediate protection of the court, the court may order that the child be removed from the custody of the child's parent, guardian, legal custodian, or the person who physically possesses or controls the child and be placed in the custody of a suitable person, persons, or agency, as specified in § 37-1-116(d), pending further investigation and hearing. When a child alleged to be dependent and neglected is removed from the custody of such child's parent, guardian, legal custodian, or the person who physically possesses or controls the child prior to a hearing on a petition, a preliminary hearing shall be held no later than seventy-two (72) hours after the child's removal to determine whether such child's continued removal is required under § 37-1-114. In computing the time limitation for purposes of such preliminary hearing, nonjudicial days are excluded, but in no event shall the hearing be held later than eighty-four (84) hours after the child is removed from the home.

If a child is removed from the home prior to the filing of a petition, a petition shall be filed within forty-eight (48) hours of the removal, excluding nonjudicial days, unless the child is returned to the home within the forty-eight hour time period. In no event shall a petition be filed later than the preliminary hearing.

This subsection (b) may be waived by express and knowing waiver, by the parties to an action including the parents, guardian, or legal custodian and the child or guardian ad litem for the child. Any such waiver may be revoked at any time, at which time this section shall apply. The court shall make every effort to advise the parent, guardian, or legal custodian, and the child individually, if fourteen (14) years of age or older, of the time, date, and place of the hearing and the factual circumstances necessitating the removal.

If the child is not so released, and a parent, guardian, or legal custodian has not been notified of the hearing, did not appear or waived appearance at this hearing, and files an affidavit showing these facts, the court shall rehear the matter without unnecessary delay and order such child's release unless it appears from the hearing that the child's detention or shelter care is required under § 37-1-114.

Acts 1970, ch. 600, § 17; 1973, ch. 269, § 3; 1979, ch. 289, § 4; 1980, ch. 595, § 2; 1981, ch. 247, §§ 5, 6; 1981, ch. 458, § 2; 1982, ch. 882, § 3; 1983, ch. 254, § 3; T.C.A., § 37-217; Acts 2009, ch. 235, § 1; 2016, ch. 598, § 2; 2018, ch. 1052, § 14.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 235, § 1 directed the code commission to change all references from “child support referee” and “juvenile referee” to “child support magistrate” and “juvenile magistrate” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Acts 1983, ch. 254, § 5 provided that the amendment by that act shall not be construed as altering or decreasing the maximum period of eighty-four hours that a juvenile may be detained without a hearing.

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Juvenile Justice Reform Act of 2018.”

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 55 provided that it is the intent of the general assembly that improvements to the juvenile justice system and expansion of community-based resources for justice-involved children be prioritized, including, but not limited to, evidence-based programs, informal adjustment, diversion, home placement supervision, statewide data collection, early intervention programs and services for children and families, and mental health services, especially in any county underserved with such programs and services.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment rewrote the section which read: “(a) If a child is brought before the court or delivered to a detention facility designated by the court, the intake or other authorized officer of the court shall immediately make an investigation and release the child unless it appears that such child's detention is warranted or required under §37-1-114.“(b)(1) If such child is not so released, a petition under §37-1-120 shall be made promptly and presented to the court. In the case of a child alleged to be delinquent, a detention hearing shall be held no later than three (3) days after the child is placed in detention to determine whether such child's detention is required under §37-1-114. In computing the three (3) days' limitation for purposes of such detention hearing, nonjudicial days are excluded. If a juvenile is detained as provided in § 37-1-114, a detention hearing shall be held no later than eighty-four (84) hours after the child is placed in detention pursuant to § 37-1-114.“(2) In the alternative, if the child is not so released, a warrant committing the child may be sworn out before the court or magistrate by the person producing the child for commitment. Immediately upon receiving a child committed under a warrant, however, the petition shall be made promptly and presented to the court as provided in subdivision (b)(1).“(c) If a child alleged to be dependent and neglected is removed from the custody of such child's parent, guardian or legal custodian prior to a hearing on the petition, a preliminary hearing shall be held no later than three (3) days after the child's removal, excluding Saturdays, Sundays and legal holidays, to determine whether such child's removal is required under § 37-1-114. If the court determines that the child's removal is required under § 37-1-114, the court may order that the child be placed in the custody of a suitable person, persons or agency, as specified in §37-1-116(d). This subsection (c) may be waived by express and knowing waiver, by the parties to an action including the parents, guardian or legal custodian and the child or guardian ad litem for the child if the child is of tender years. Any such waiver may be revoked at any time, at which time this subsection (c) shall apply. The court shall make every effort to advise the parent, guardian or legal custodian, and the child individually, if fourteen (14) years of age or older or alleged to be delinquent or unruly, of the time, date and place of the hearing and the factual circumstances necessitating the removal.“(d) If the child is not so released, and a parent, guardian or custodian has not been notified of the informal hearing, did not appear or waive appearance at this hearing, and files an affidavit showing these facts, the court shall rehear the matter without unnecessary delay and order such child's release unless it appears from the hearing that the child's detention or shelter care is required under § 37-1-114.“(e) The court, in its discretion, may release the child on an appearance bond.”

The 2018 amendment, in (a)(2), inserted the second sentence and, at the end, added “or on the child’s own recognizance subject to a written agreement to appear in court.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 598, § 5. July 1, 2016.

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 58. July 1, 2018; provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act took effect on May 21, 2018.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in the text of Rule 5 and in the Advisory Commission Comments of Rules 6 and 16 of the Tennessee Rules of Juvenile Procedure.

Law Reviews.

Rules of Procedure for Courts with Juvenile Jurisdiction in Tennessee (R.B.J. Campbelle, Jr.), 18 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 20 (1982).

The DOJ Comes to Town: An Argument for Legislative Reform When the Juvenile Court Fails to Protect Due Process Rights, 44 U. Mem. L. Rev. 921 (2014).

Collateral References.

Right of bail in proceedings in juvenile court. 53 A.L.R.3d 848.

37-1-118. Subpoenas.

Upon application of a party, the court or the clerk of the court shall issue, or the court on its own motion may issue, subpoenas requiring attendance and testimony of witnesses and production of papers at any hearing under this part.

Acts 1970, ch. 600, § 18; T.C.A., § 37-218.

Law Reviews.

Rules of Procedure for Courts with Juvenile Jurisdiction in Tennessee (R.B.J. Campbelle, Jr.), 18 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 20 (1982).

37-1-119. Petition — Who may make.

The petition may be made by any person, including a law enforcement officer, who has knowledge of the facts alleged or is informed and believes that they are true.

Acts 1970, ch. 600, § 19; T.C.A., § 37-219.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 8.3.

Law Reviews.

Storied Anna Mae He Decision Clarifies Law But Leaves Unanswered Questions (Christina A. Zawisza), 38 U. Mem. L. Rev. 637 (2008).